District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.07

Small purchase procurements.

(a)

The CPO may establish a streamlined process for entering into contracts for goods and services not exceeding $100,000. The process shall set forth:

(1)

Requirements for basic competition, including solicitation of contracts or orders from multiple vendors;

(2)

A noncompetitive process for entering into contracts under a dollar threshold established by the CPO not to exceed $10,000; and

(3)

Requirements that purchases be made transparent.

(a-1)

The Tax Revision Commission may establish a streamlined noncompetitive process for entering into contracts for goods and services not exceeding $40,000.

(b)

Procurement requirements shall not be parceled, split, divided, or purchased over a period of time to avoid the $100,000 limitation of subsection (a) of this section or the $40,000 limitation of subsection (a-1) of this section.

(c)

The CPO shall implement standards to monitor small purchase procedures to ensure compliance with applicable laws, rules, and policies.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 407, 58 DCR 1185
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7143(b), 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 2-352.01, § 2-354.01, and § 2-356.02.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (a-1); and added “or the $40,000 limitation of subsection (a-1) of this section” in (b).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 3(b) of the Tax Revision Commission Report Extension and Procurement Streamlining Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-5, May 18, 2013, 60 DCR 4667, 20 DCSTAT 1272).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3(b) of the Tax Revision Commission Report Extension and Procurement Streamlining Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-19, March 1, 2013, 60 DCR 3974, 20 DCSTAT 476).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3(b) of the Tax Revision Commission Report Extension and Procurement Streamlining Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-67, May 15, 2013, 60 DCR 7232, 20 DCSTAT 1417).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7143(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7143(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 7141 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle N of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Tax Revision Commission Extension and Procurement Streamlining Amendment Act of 2013”.